Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1506
Commission; promote program.

The commission
shall promote the harvesting of deer by hunters and the donation of deer at
meat processors participating in the program to the extent that money is available
in the Hunters Helping the Hungry Cash Fund.

Laws 2012, LB928, § 10.